North Carolina, session 2025, SB970.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-4.01(7a) reads as rewritten:
"(7a) Electric Assisted Bicycle. – A bicycle with two or three wheels that is
equipped with a seat or saddle for use by the rider, fully operable pedals for
human propulsion, and an electric motor of no more than 750 watts, whose
maximum speed on a level surface when powered solely by such a motor is
no greater than 20 miles per hour.watts that meets the requirements of one of
the following three classes:
a. Class 1 electric assisted bicycle. – A bicycle equipped with a motor
that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to
assist once the bicycle reaches a speed of 20 miles per hour.
b. Class 2 electric assisted bicycle. – A bicycle equipped with a motor
that may propel the bicycle without pedaling but ceases to assist once
the bicycle reaches a speed of 20 miles per hour.
c. Class 3 electric assisted bicycle. – A bicycle equipped with a motor
that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to
assist once the bicycle reaches a speed of 28 miles per hour."
SECTION 2. Article 3 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-171.3. Electric bicycles.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in G.S. 160A-300.2 and G.S. 153A-245.1, the operation
of an electric assisted bicycle as defined in G.S. 20-4.01 shall be permitted on all roadways,
bicycle lanes, and shared-use paths.
(b) A person under the age of 18 operating or riding as a passenger on a Class 3 electric
assisted bicycle shall wear a helmet that meets federal safety standards."
SECTION 3.(a) Article 15 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160A-300.2. Electric bicycles.
(a) A city may regulate the use of electric assisted bicycles on any street, road, or highway
within municipal limits. This authority shall include the following:
(1) Restricting the use of a class or classes of electric assisted bicycles on multiuse
paths, sidewalks, or trails.
(2) Establishing speed limits on greenways or shared-use paths.
*S970-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A city may require the use of a helmet by a person under the age of 18 operating or
riding as a passenger on a Class 1 or Class 2 electric assisted bicycle.
(c) A city may impose penalties for violations of this section."
SECTION 3.(b) Article 12 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 153A-245.1. Regulation of electric bicycles.
A county may regulate the use of an electric assisted bicycle in accordance with
G.S. 160A-300.2. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to restrict or repeal the authority of a
city to regulate the use of an electric assisted bicycle."
SECTION 4. The Department of Transportation shall develop educational materials
on the proper use and safety considerations of electric assisted bicycles.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to implement Section 4 of this act.
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to all electric
assisted bicycle riders and passengers on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 970-First Edition